Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2192
Issue between owner and encumbrancer; order; effect.

The court may direct an issue to be made up between the encumbrancer and the owner, which shall be decisive of their respective rights.

R.S.1867, Code § 825, p. 540;

R.S.1913, § 8308;

C.S.1922, § 9260;

C.S.1929, § 20-2192;

R.S.1943, § 25-2192.

Court may direct issues to be made up between encumbrancer and owner of share. Hartman v. Drake, 166 Neb. 87, 87 N.W.2d 895 (1958).